Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5723.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 16a. (1) Not later than 90 days after the effective date
of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall
establish the provider advisory council.
(2) The council shall consist of at least 7 members, but not
more than 11 members, appointed by the Association of Accredited
OOH H05548'25 (H-2) vh52st


Child and Family Services Agencies. Council members must include
providers that represent organizations licensed by the department
as a child placing agency or child caring institution. Council
members must reside and have their primary address in this state
and be currently employed by private agencies whose headquarters
are in this state.
(3) Members of the council shall serve 3-year terms and may be
reappointed. The council shall meet at least quarterly each year
with the director of the department and may convene special
meetings as needed to do any of the following:
(a) Review proposed initial contracts, renewals, or material
amendments to current and existing contracts with child caring
institutions or child placing agencies.
(b) Review department-issued requests for proposals and
notices of funding availability.
(4) Not later than 30 days after the department establishes
the council, the department shall submit all proposed initial
contracts, renewals, or material amendments to current and existing
contracts with child caring institutions or child placing agencies
to the council not less than 120 days before the date the
department presents the contracts, renewals, or material amendments
to the child caring institution or child placing agency for
signing. The department shall include draft language for rates,
scope of services, performance expectations, indemnification and
insurance requirements, and any other material terms in the
proposed initial contracts, renewals, or material amendments to
current and existing contracts. The council shall review the
proposed initial contracts, renewals, or material amendments to
current and existing contracts and may, by majority vote, issue a
OOH H05548'25 (H-2) vh52st


written recommendation of support, opposition, or suggested
modifications within 45 days of receiving the materials described
in this subsection from the department. Except for the council's
recommendation of opposition as described under subsection (5), if
the council issues a written recommendation as described under this
subsection, the department shall prepare a written response that
addresses each recommendation and state whether the recommendation
is accepted, modified, or rejected, and the rationale for each
decision. Except as otherwise provided under subsection (6),
completion of the council's review and the department's written
response under this subsection is required before execution of a
new or amended contract. The department shall transmit the written
response to the house and senate committees with jurisdiction over
child welfare.
(5) The council shall issue a written recommendation of
opposition or for existing contract termination if the council
finds that the proposed initial contracts, renewals, or material
amendments to current and existing contracts are between the
department and a child caring institution or child placing agency
that is owned by illegal immigrants, employs illegal immigrants, or
demonstrates evidence of fraudulent business activity. The
department shall accept the council's recommendation of opposition
as described under this section.
(6) If the department executes a new or amended contract
without complying with subsections (4) and (5), the department
shall provide a written explanation detailing the basis for its
decision and publish the explanation on its public website within
10 business days of making the decision but not later than 60 days
before the contract goes into effect. Subsections (4) and (5) do
OOH H05548'25 (H-2) vh52st


not apply if any of the following apply:
(a) The department is responding to a declared public health
or child welfare emergency by the governor's office.
(b) The contract is required to comply with a federal statute
or rule or judicial order.
(7) A council member shall do all of the following:
(a) Conduct the council member with integrity, impartiality,
and transparency.
(b) File an annual conflict of interest disclosure form with
the department and update the conflict of interest disclosure form
promptly on any change.
(c) For each contract under consideration, disclose any
material financial interest relating to an actual or prospective
counterparty.
(8) A council member shall not do any of the following:
(a) Solicit or accept, directly or indirectly, any gift,
favor, or thing of value from any person or entity with a financial
interest in a contract under consideration, other than items of
nominal value permitted by department policy.
(b) Engage in collusion, bid rigging, price fixing, market
allocation, or other anticompetitive conduct in connection with the
department's contracts.
(9) A violation of subsection (8) constitutes a material
breach and may result in disqualification, contract termination,
damages, administrative sanctions, and referral to the attorney
general or appropriate law enforcement authority for criminal
charges.
(10) The department may remove a council member for repeated
or willful failure to exercise the council member's duties after
OOH H05548'25 (H-2) vh52st


written notice and an opportunity to respond.
(11) The department shall not retaliate against a council
member who, in good faith, reports a suspected conflict of
interest, collusion, or other violation under this subsection.
(12) As used in this section, "council" means the provider
advisory council established under subsection (1).
Final Page
OOH H05548'25 (H-2) vh52st